Washington statutes.
RCW 10.91.020

Preliminary hearing—Waiver—Conditions of release.

(1) The person whose removal is sought shall be brought before the judicial officer without unnecessary delay upon arrest pursuant to the warrant; whereupon the judicial officer shall set a time and place for hearing, and shall advise the person of his or her right to have the assistance of counsel, to confront the witnesses against him or her, and to produce evidence in his or her own behalf at the hearing.

(2) The person whose removal is sought may at this time in writing waive the hearing and agree to be returned to the demanding court, judge, or magistrate. If a waiver is executed, the judicial officer shall issue an order pursuant to RCW 10.91.030.

(3) The judicial officer may impose conditions of release authorized by the laws of this state which will reasonably assure the appearance at the hearing of the person whose removal is sought.

[ 2010 c 8 s 1090; 1971 ex.s. c 17 s 3.]